dictionaries/qu_EC/qu_EC.aff
# ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------
#
#    Shukllachiska Kichwa del Ecuador, hunspell format dictionary affix file
#    Copyright (C) 2009 Arno Teigseth, Henry David Lara
#
#    This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
#    it under the terms of the GNU Affero General Public License as published by
#    the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
#    (at your option) any later version.
#
#    This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
#    but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#    MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
#    GNU Affero General Public License for more details.
#
#    You should have received a copy of the GNU Affero General Public License
#    along with this program. See LICENSE.txt. If not, see <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.
#
#    The author(s) can be contacted at arno at teigseth dot no
#
# ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------
# 

BREAK 1
BREAK -
# Allow checking of words on both sides of - : Mateo 10: 12-kama 16-tami will check 12 and kama separately

SET UTF-8
TRY akinuhstpmrclyoweñdbjgvzfqx

NOSUGGEST !   # Bad words, don't suggest them.

FORBIDDENWORD ¤  # Bad combinations.

COMPOUNDMIN 1 # Minimum length of compound words

COMPOUNDBEGIN /      # start comp, all words (except accented ones) in kichwa...
COMPOUNDMIDDLE -     # middle comp
COMPOUNDEND >        # end comp
COMPOUNDPERMITFLAG + # allow (stem+affix)+compound
COMPOUNDFORBIDFLAG 1 # words not allowed in compounds, e.g. espíritu ok but not espírituka
                     # really redundant for the words with no / specified
ONLYINCOMPOUND x     # words allowed only in compounds, e.g. espíritu/ ok while forcing espiritu|ka = espiritu//x

REP 8
REP ai ay
REP gui ki
REP hua wa
REP j k
REP ng nk
REP qui ki
REP taj tak
REP iy y


# VERBS

## Suggestions from norsk quechua-side på wikipedia:
## -naku (gjensidig) klemme markana -hverandre markanakuna ?
## -chka kontinuerlig "to be eating" mikuchkana | mikuna

SFX v Y 39        #Verbs, conjugation
SFX v na na//+ na          # Infinitive
SFX v na ni//+ na          # Present 1st person singular
SFX v na nki//+ na         # Present 2nd person singular | Future 2nd person singular/plural
SFX v na n//+ na           # Present 3rd person singular
SFX v na nchik//+ na       # Present 1st person plural
SFX v na nkichik//+ na     # Present 2nd person plural
SFX v na nkuna//+ na       # Present 3nd person plural
SFX v na sha//+ na         # Future 1st person singular
SFX v na nka//+ na         # Future 3rd person singular/plural
SFX v na shun//+ na        # Future 1st person plural
SFX v na rkani//+ na       # Past 1st person singular
SFX v na rkanki//+ na      # Past 2nd person singular
SFX v na rka//+ na         # Past 3rd person singular
SFX v na rkanchik//+ na    # Past 1st person plural
SFX v na rkankichik//+ na  # Past 2nd person plural
SFX v na rkankuna//+ na    # Past 3nd person plural
SFX v na nkapak//+ na      # for/to
SFX v na shpaka//+ na      # Contitional same person
SFX v na kpika//+ na       # Contitional other person
SFX v na k//+ na           # Personification
SFX v na y//+ [^i]na       # Imperative 1st person singular / Nounification rura|na   => rura|y
SFX v na yari// [^i]na     # "More" Imperative 1st person singular / Nounification rura|na   => rura|y
SFX v ina i//+ ina         # Imperative 1st person singular / Nounification yuyari|na => yuyar|i (not yuyariy)
SFX v na pay//+ na         # Imperative 1st person singular POLITE
SFX v na panki//+ na       # Imperative 3rd person singular POLITE
SFX v na pankichik//+ na   # Imperative 1st person plural POLITE
SFX v na payari// na       # "More" Imperative 1st person singular POLITE
SFX v na chun//+ na        # Imperative 3rd person singular / Present subjunctive
SFX v na ychi//+ na        # Imperative 2nd person plural
SFX v na chunkuna//+ na    # Imperative 3rd person plural
SFX v na shkani//+ na      # Perfect 1st person singular
SFX v na shkanki//+ na     # Perfect 2nd person singular
SFX v na shka//+ na        # Perfect 3rd person singular
SFX v na shkanchik//+ na   # Perfect 1st person plural
SFX v na shkankichik//+ na # Perfect 2nd person plural
SFX v na shkakuna//+ na    # Perfect 3rd person plural
SFX v na shkarka//+ na     # Plusperfect [persons?]
SFX v na shpa//+ na        # Gerund same person.
SFX v na shkanka//+ na     # bh

# Infixes like -ri- -ku- -gri- etc are to be put in qi_EC.dic
# See qi_EC.dic.MASTER

## Suggestions from norsk quechua(Cusco)-side på wikipedia:

## -mi- (helt sikkert) Ñuka shuti Arnomi kan.
## -si- ("tror jeg") Tayta Galo chufirsi (Mr Galo er sjåfør - eller jeg tror det ihvertfall)
## -chá (sannsynligvis) Tayta Galo chufirchá (Mr Galo er sannsynligvis sjåfør)
## -pa-  til fordel for andre
## -ku-  til fordel for ham selv
### -ku- er diminutiv når brukt i substantiver.
## -ri-  ubetydelig, meningsløs
## -yku- uvanlig
## -ru-  viktig, haster
## -lla- beklagelig
## -sqa- var ikke talerens ansvar
