dictionaries/qu_EC/qu_EC.dic
acusakuchina//v
adoranakuna//v
agradicirimuna//v
aklluchina//v
aktukuna//v
akurana//v
alabawana//v
allawkayakrina//v
allichimuwana//v
allishunkuyarikrina//v
alliyakuchina//v
aminakuna//v
amirimuna//v
amsayachina//v
amukyakuna//v
amullirana//v
anchuchiwana//v
anchuririkrina//v
animawana//v
ankuyakrina//v
apamuchinakuna//v
aparichiwana//v
apiyakuna//v
arirana//v
armarikrina//v
ashnakyachikrina//v
ashnarichina//v
asichikrina//v
asirinakuna//v
aspirikrina//v
awachikuna//v
awllikumuna//v
aysanamukuna//v
ayudarina//v
bautizachirina//v
bendiciyamukuna//v
beneficiarichina//v
cacharichikrina//v
cambiakuchina//v
cantanakuna//v
castigarimuna//v
chakichina//v
chakmakuna//v
chaknarana//v
chakruwana//v
challchuyakrina//v
challiyamuwana//v
chamukyarikuna//v
chapachinakuna//v
chapukumurina//v
charina//v
charkiriyana//v
chashpichiwana//v
chaskimuna//v
chaspirikrina//v
chawayachikuna//v
chawchayakumuna//v
chawpiyanamukuna//v
chayachirina//v
chichuyakuna//v
chikanyarana//v
chikniwana//v
chillpikrina//v
chillpiyamuwana//v
chimpapuchina//v
chimpapurachirichina//v
chinikumurina//v
chinkachina//v
chinkayachirina//v
chirapamukuna//v
chiriyarichina//v
chuchuchikrina//v
chukakuchina//v
chukchunakuna//v
chukririmuna//v
chulluyachina//v
chumpillikuna//v
chunkarana//v
chunkayawana//v
chupikrina//v
churamuwana//v
chururikuna//v
chuskuyachinakuna//v
chusuyakumurina//v
chutana//v
chuyayariyana//v
contestachiwana//v
convidamuna//v
cuidarikrina//v
discretoyachikuna//v
divorciakumuna//v
escribinamukuna//v
esforzarina//v
gratisyachirina//v
hilluyamukuna//v
humildeyarichina//v
ikiyachikrina//v
illakuchina//v
illanakuna//v
importarimuna//v
intindichina//v
inventakuna//v
invitarana//v
iriwana//v
ishkayyakrina//v
ishkumuwana//v
ishparikuna//v
ismuchinakuna//v
ismuyakumurina//v
jachachina//v
jakanyariyana//v
jamuktachiwana//v
jamukyamuna//v
janakyrikrina//v
japikuchina//v
jarkanakuna//v
jasmarimuna//v
jatunyachichina//v
jatunyana//v
jawayariyana//v
jayakyachiwana//v
jaytamuna//v
jicharikrina//v
jikichikuna//v
juchachikumuna//v
jucharimuna//v
jukuchina//v
jukuyakuna//v
jumpirana//v
juntawana//v
jutkukrina//v
kachamuwana//v
kachikrina//v
kakuchikrina//v
kalimakrina//v
kallarimuwana//v
kallparikuna//v
kamarikumurina//v
kamchanakuna//v
kamirimuna//v
kanchisyarina//v
kankurichirina//v
kapakyamukuna//v
kaparirichina//v
karachikrina//v
kariyachinakuna//v
karkayakumurina//v
karkuna//v
karuyariyana//v
kashtuchiwana//v
kasiyamuna//v
kasparikrina//v
kasuchikuna//v
katakumuna//v
katinamukuna//v
katurina//v
kaupuchirina//v
kawchukuna//v
kawirana//v
kawpuwana//v
kawsarimuwana//v
kayarichina//v
kichkiyachikrina//v
kichukuchina//v
kikinyanakuna//v
killachirimuna//v
killkachina//v
killpakuna//v
killuyarana//v
kimiwana//v
kinchakrina//v
kinkuchimuwana//v
kintiyachikuna//v
kipayakumuna//v
kishpichinamukuna//v
kishpiririna//v
kiwichirina//v
krimukuna//v
kuchumuna//v
kulluyanakuna//v
kulunyarimuna//v
kumurikuna//v
kunanamukuna//v
kunkarimuna//v
kunuchina//v
kunukyawana//v
kurkuyakuna//v
kurururana//v
kusawana//v
kushichimuwana//v
kushiyachinakuna//v
kushnichikumurina//v
kushpana//v
kuskachina//v
kutakuna//v
kutichirana//v
kutimurikuna//v
kutsiyarana//v
kutuwana//v
kuyachichiwana//v
kuyarichina//v
kuyuchichikrina//v
kuyumuwana//v
lanchachikrina//v
liyikuchina//v
llakinakuna//v
llakllachikuna//v
llampukumuna//v
llampuyanamukuna//v
llankarina//v
llashakyarichina//v
llatamukuna//v
llatarichina//v
llikichikrina//v
llikiyakuchina//v
llimpikyanakuna//v
llimpiyakyakuna//v
lluchkachina//v
lluchkayakuna//v
lluchurana//v
lluchuyawana//v
llukiyakrina//v
llukshimuwana//v
llullakyakumurina//v
llulluyachinakuna//v
llumiyakumurina//v
llunchina//v
llupiriyana//v
llushtuchiwana//v
llutamuna//v
lutsarikrina//v
makachikuna//v
makanakurikrina//v
mallina//v
mañachiriyana//v
manchamukuna//v
manchariyana//v
mapayachiwana//v
maskamuna//v
mayllarikrina//v
maywayachikuna//v
michikumuna//v
mikunamukuna//v
millarina//v
millpuchirina//v
ministimukuna//v
minkachirichina//v
mirakrina//v
mishamuwana//v
mishkichirikuna//v
mitsachinakuna//v
mitsakyariyana//v
miyuna//v
muchariyana//v
mukuchiwana//v
mulamuna//v
munarikrina//v
muruyachikuna//v
mushukyakumuna//v
muskunamukuna//v
musparina//v
mutiyachirina//v
mutkichimukuna//v
mutkiwana//v
muyukrina//v
ñakchamuwana//v
nanarichinakuna//v
ñañuyakuchina//v
ñawchinakuna//v
ñawparimuna//v
nichina//v
ñitimukuna//v
nitkarichina//v
ñutuwana//v
nuyukrina//v
obedecimuwana//v
pagarikuna//v
pakarimukrina//v
pakikuna//v
paktarana//v
paktayawana//v
pallakrina//v
pampamuwana//v
pankallayarikuna//v
pantayachinakuna//v
parlakumurina//v
pasayana//v
paskariyana//v
patarichiwana//v
pawamuna//v
perdonarikrina//v
pimiyachikuna//v
piñakumuna//v
piñayanamukuna//v
pinkarina//v
pishichirina//v
pishkayamukuna//v
pitirichina//v
preparachikrina//v
puchukachikuna//v
puchunakuna//v
pudirimuna//v
pukllachina//v
pukukuna//v
pulurana//v
punchayawana//v
purayakrina//v
purimuwana//v
purunyarikuna//v
pushkachinakuna//v
puskukumurina//v
pusuyana//v
puyariyana//v
rakichiwana//v
rantimuna//v
rasurikrina//v
rawnachikuna//v
rawrakumuna//v
respetanamukuna//v
richakyamukuna//v
richirina//v
rikchakawana//v
rikcharirikrina//v
riksiriyana//v
rikumukuna//v
rikunayachikuna//v
rikurikuchina//v
rimamuna//v
rimarikuna//v
rsarkimuwana//v
rukuyarikuna//v
rupachinakuna//v
rurakumurina//v
rutuna//v
sakirichiwana//v
sakmakuna//v
sakrayarana//v
salvawana//v
sañiyakrina//v
sankuyamuwana//v
santificarikuna//v
saruchinakuna//v
sasirkumurina//v
satina//v
sawaririyana//v
semachiwana//v
shalakanayamuna//v
shamurikrina//v
shayakyanamukuna//v
shayarinamukuna//v
shaykurikuna//v
shinayakuna//v
shitakuna//v
shuktakyana//v
shukyariyana//v
shutichichiwana//v
shutiyamuna//v
shuturikrina//v
shuyachikuna//v
shuyukumuna//v
shuyushkayana//v
sikarina//v
sinkuchirina//v
sintimukuna//v
sipirichina//v
sirvichikrina//v
sisakuchina//v
suchunakuna//v
suchuyarimuna//v
sumakyachina//v
surkukuna//v
tacarana//v
takawana//v
takllakrina//v
takshamuwana//v
tallirichinakuna//v
tamiyakuchina//v
tanikyanakuna//v
tankarimuna//v
tantakumurina//v
tantarana//v
tapachirina//v
tapumukuna//v
taririchina//v
tikllayachikrina//v
tikpakuchina//v
tikrachinakuna//v
timpuchinakuna//v
tinkakumurina//v
tinkina//v
tipiriyana//v
tocachiwana//v
trabajamuna//v
tratarikrina//v
tsankachikuna//v
tsankayakumuna//v
tsantsayanamukuna//v
tsikllayarina//v
tsunkamukuna//v
tuktsachikrina//v
tukurichinakuna//v
tulanakuna//v
tuñirichina//v
tupurana//v
uhukrina//v
ukllarikuna//v
unayakumurina//v
unikillariyana//v
upyamuna//v
urmachikuna//v
utilizanamukuna//v
valichirina//v
visitarichina//v
wakaychikuchina//v
wakchayarimuna//v
waktakuna//v
walutuyawana//v
wanamuwana//v
wañukumuna//v
washayarina//v
watamukuna//v
waykachina//v
waynayarana//v
wichakrina//v
willarikuna//v
wiñanamukuna//v
wisiyachirina//v
yachakuna//v
yallichiwana//v
yanapanakuna//v
yanuchinakuna//v
yapuna//v
yupachinakuna//v
yuyakyachiwana//v
yuyayyakuna//v
